District of Columbia statutes.
5-1403

Supporting services and facilities.

(a)

The CME shall appoint such qualified professional, investigative, technical and clerical personnel as the OCME may require, including administrators, medicolegal investigators, and a General Counsel. The General Counsel shall be appointed pursuant to subchapter VIII-B of Chapter 6 of Title 1.

(b)

The Mayor shall provide such facilities and equipment, as the OCME shall require. The Chief Medical Examiner may arrange or contract for such services, equipment and facilities as deemed necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the OCME, pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 2.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2904, 47 DCR 6308
1981 Ed., § 11-2302.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2904 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).